th: วัสดุสำหรับด้ามปืนลูกซอง: ไม้บีช; ไม้เบิร์ช; คอมโพสิต; ไม้ลามิเนต; ไม้เมเปิล; โลหะ; พอลิเมอร์/วัสดุสังเคราะห์; ไม้โรสวูด; ไม้วอลนัท; อื่นๆ
nl: Hagelgeweer kolfmateriaal: Beukenhout; Berkenhout; Composiet; Gelamineerd hout; Esdoornhout; Metaal; Polymeer/synthetisch; Palissander; Walnoot; Overig
tr: Av tüfeği dipçiği malzemesi: Kayın; Huş; Kompozit; Laminant ahşap; Akçaağaç; Metal; Polimer/sentetik; Gül ağacı; Ceviz; Diğer
el: Υλικό κοντακιού καραμπίνας: Οξιά; Σημύδα; Σύνθετο υλικό; Επικολλητό ξύλο; Σφενδάμι; Μέταλλο; Πολυμερές/Συνθετικό; Τριανταφυλλιά; Καρυδιά; Άλλο
sv: Material för hagelgevärsstock: Bok; Björk; Komposit; Laminatträ; Lönn; Metall; Polymer/syntet; Rosenträ; Valnöt; Övrigt
zh-TW: 散彈槍槍托材質: 山毛櫸木; 樺木; 複合材質; 層壓木; 楓木; 金屬; 聚合物/合成材質; 玫瑰木; 胡桃木; 其他
ro-RO: Material al patului pentru pușca de vânătoare: Fag; Mesteacăn; Compozit; Lemn laminat; Arțar; Metal; Polimer/Sintetic; Lemn de trandafir; Nuc; Altele
fr: Matériau de la crosse et du devant du fusil de chasse: Hêtre; Bouleau; Composite; Bois stratifié; Érable; Métal; Polymère/synthétique; Palissandre; Noyer; Autre
bg-BG: Материал на приклада на гладкоцевната пушка: Бук; Бреза; Композитен материал; Ламинирано дърво; Клен; Метал; Полимер/синтетика; Палисандрово дърво; Орех; Друго
hr-HR: Materijal kundaka sačmarice: Bukva; Breza; Kompozit; Laminirano drvo; Javor; Metal; Polimer / sintetika; Ružino drvo; Orah; Drugo
de: Material des Schrotflintenschafts: Buche; Birke; Komposit; Schichtholz; Ahorn; Metall; Polymer/Synthetik; Palisander; Walnuss; Andere
es: Material para la culata de la escopeta: Haya; Abedul; Material compuesto; Madera laminada; Arce; Metal; Polímero/sintético; Palo de rosa; Nogal; Otro
sl-SI: Material kopita šibrovke: Bukev; Breza; Kompozit; Laminiran les; Javor; Kovina; Polimer/Sintetika; Palisander; Oreh; Drugo
en: Shotgun stock material: Beech; Birch; Composite; Laminate wood; Maple; Metal; Polymer/Synthetic; Rosewood; Walnut; Other
cs: Materiál pažby brokovnice: Buk; Bříza; Kompozit; Laminované dřevo; Javor; Kov; Polymer/syntetika; Palisandr; Ořech; Jiný
ja: ショットガンストック素材: ビーチ; バーチ; コンポジット; 合板; メープル; 金属; ポリマー/合成素材; ローズウッド; ウォールナット; その他
pt-BR: Espingarda material da coronha: Faia; Bétula; Material composto; Madeira laminada; Bordo; Metal; Polímero/sintético; Jacarandá; Nogueira; Outro
zh-CN: 霰弹枪枪托材质: 山毛榉木; 桦木; 复合材料; 层压木; 枫木; 金属; 聚合物/合成材料; 红木; 胡桃木; 其他
pl: Materiał kolby strzelby: Buk; Brzoza; Kompozyt; Laminat drewniany; Klon; Metal; Polimer/syntetyk; Palisander; Orzech; Inne
sk-SK: Materiál pažby brokovnice: Buk; Breza; Kompozit; Laminátové drevo; Javor; Kov; Polymér/syntetika; Palisander; Orech; Iné
da: Skæftemateriale for haglgevær: Bøg; Birk; Komposit; Laminattræ; Ahorn; Metal; Polymer/syntetisk; Palisander; Valnød; Andet
ru: Материал ложи дробовика: Бук; Береза; Композитный материал; Ламинированная древесина; Клен; Металл; Полимер/синтетика; Палисандр; Орех; Другое
hu: Sörétes puskatus anyaga: Bükk; Nyír; Kompozit; Rétegelt fa; Juhar; Fém; Polimer/Szintetikus; Rózsafa; Dió; Egyéb
nb: Materiale for haglekolbe: Bøk; Bjørk; Kompositt; Laminert tre; Lønn; Metall; Polymer/syntetisk; Palisander; Valnøtt; Annet
vi: Vật liệu làm báng súng săn: Gỗ dẻ gai; Gỗ bạch dương; Composite; Gỗ dán; Gỗ phong; Kim loại; Polyme/Tổng hợp; Gỗ cẩm lai; Gỗ óc chó; Khác
fi: Haulikon tukin materiaali: Pyökki; Koivu; Komposiitti; Laminaattipuu; Vaahtera; Metalli; Polymeeri/synteettinen; Ruusupuu; Pähkinäpuu; Muu
lt-LT: Šautuvo buožės medžiaga: Bukas; Beržas; Kompozitas; Laminuota mediena; Klevas; Metalas; Polimeras / sintetika; Raudonmedis; Riešutmedis; Kita
pt-PT: Material da coronha da espingarda: Faia; Bétula; Composto; Madeira laminada; Bordo; Metal; Polímero/sintético; Pau-rosa; Nogueira; Outro
ko: 산탄총 개머리판 소재: 너도밤나무; 자작나무; 복합재; 합판; 단풍나무; 금속; 폴리머/합성; 장미목; 호두나무; 기타
it: Materiale del calcio del fucile: Faggio; Betulla; Materiale composito; Legno laminato; Acero; Metallo; Polimero/sintetico; Palissandro; Noce; Altro